siciliano-clitics-unfinished.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V_ARI +V_IRI +V_FIN +V_NOFIN +V_PP
+INF +IND +SUBJ +COND +IMP +PART +GER
+PRES +IMPERF +PAST +FUT
+1 +2 +3
+GLI +VEL_A +VEL_Y
+C_CE +C_CI +C_GLI +C_LA +C_LE +C_LI +C_LO +C_ME +C_MI +C_NE +C_SE +C_SI +C_TE +C_TI +C_VE +C_VI

LEXICON SufVerbAri
	+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*ari #;
!-- Needs SufClit to be done first!
!	+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*ar SufClit;

	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+SING:+IND+PRES+1+SING*u #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+SING:+IND+PRES+2+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+SING:+IND+PRES+3+SING*a #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+PLUR:+IND+PRES+1+PLUR*amu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+PLUR:+IND+PRES+2+PLUR*ati #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*anu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*unu #;

	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*ava #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*avu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*avi #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*ava #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*àvamu #;
	
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*avamu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*àvavu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*avavu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*avanu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*avunu #;

	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ai #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*avi #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*aiu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*avu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+SING:+IND+PAST+2+SING*asti #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+SING:+IND+PAST+3+SING*au #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+SING:+IND+PAST+3+SING*ò #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*ammu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*amu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*astivu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*astu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*arunu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*aru #;

	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+SING:+IND+FUT+1+SING*irò #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+SING:+IND+FUT+2+SING*irai #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+SING:+IND+FUT+3+SING*irà #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+PLUR:+IND+FUT+1+PLUR*iremu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+PLUR:+IND+FUT+2+PLUR*iriti #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+PLUR:+IND+FUT+3+PLUR*irannu #;

	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR*iamo #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR*iate #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR*ino #;
	
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING*assi #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING*assi #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING*assi #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR*assimu #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR*assivu #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*assiru #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*assinu #;

	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+SING:+COND+PRES+1+SING*iria #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+SING:+COND+PRES+2+SING*irissi #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+SING:+COND+PRES+3+SING*iria #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+PLUR:+COND+PRES+1+PLUR*iriamu #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+PLUR:+COND+PRES+2+PLUR*iriavu #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+PLUR:+COND+PRES+3+PLUR*irianu #;

	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+SING:+IMP+PRES+2+SING*a #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+SING:+IMP+PRES+3+SING*assi #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR*amu #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR*ati #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR*assiru #;
	
!--- unfinished italian forms ---
!	+V_PP+PART+PRES+SING:+PART+PRES+SING*ante #;
!	+V_PP+PART+PRES+PLUR:+PART+PRES+PLUR*anti #;
!---                          ---
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+SING:+PART+PAST+MASC+SING*atu #;
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING:+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING*ata #;
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR:+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR*ati #;
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR:+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR*ate #;
	
	+V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*annu #;
!-- Needs SufClit to be done first!
!	+V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*annu SufClit;

LEXICON SufVerbIri1
	+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*iri #;
!-- Needs SufClit to be done first!
!	+V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*ir SufClit;
	
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+SING:+IND+PRES+1+SING*u #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+SING:+IND+PRES+2+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+SING:+IND+PRES+3+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+PLUR:+IND+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+PLUR:+IND+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*inu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*unu #;
	
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*ia #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*iu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*eva #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*iva #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*ivi #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*evi #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*ia #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*eva #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*iva #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*iamu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*evamu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*ivamu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*iavu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*evavu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*ivavu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*ianu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*evanu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*ivanu #;
	
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ivi #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ii #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*iu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ivu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+SING:+IND+PAST+2+SING*isti #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+SING:+IND+PAST+3+SING*ìu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*emmu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*emu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*istivu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*astu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*istu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*erunu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*eru #;
	
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+SING:+IND+FUT+1+SING*irò #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+SING:+IND+FUT+2+SING*irai #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+SING:+IND+FUT+3+SING*irà #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+PLUR:+IND+FUT+1+PLUR*iremu #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+PLUR:+IND+FUT+2+PLUR*iriti #;
	+V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+PLUR:+IND+FUT+3+PLUR*irannu #;

	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING*a #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING*a #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING*a #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR*iamo #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR*iate #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR*ano #;
	
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING*issi #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING*issi #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING*issi #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR*issimu #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR*issivu #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*issiru #;
	+V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*issinu #;

	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+SING:+COND+PRES+1+SING*iria #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+SING:+COND+PRES+2+SING*irissi #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+SING:+COND+PRES+3+SING*iria #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+PLUR:+COND+PRES+1+PLUR*iriamu #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+PLUR:+COND+PRES+2+PLUR*iriavu #;
	+V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+PLUR:+COND+PRES+3+PLUR*irianu #;

	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+SING:+IMP+PRES+2+SING*i #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+SING:+IMP+PRES+3+SING*issi #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR*emu #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR*iti #;
	+V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR*issiru #;
	
!--- unfinished italian forms ---
!	+V_PP+PART+PRES+SING:+PART+PRES+SING*ente #;
!	+V_PP+PART+PRES+PLUR:+PART+PRES+PLUR*enti #;
!---                          ---
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+SING:+PART+PAST+MASC+SING*utu #;
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING:+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING*uta #;
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR:+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR*uti #;
	+V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR:+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR*uti #;
	
	+V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*ennu #;
!-- Needs SufClit to be done first!
!	+V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*ennu SufClit;

LEXICON Root 
	l_parrari:parr+V_ARI SufVerbAri ;
	l_parlari:parl+V_ARI SufVerbAri ;
	l_purtari:purt+V_ARI SufVerbAri ;
	l_rispunniri:rispun+V_IRI SufVerbIri1 ;
